Washington statutes.
RCW 11.120.140

Disclosure of digital assets to guardian or conservator of incapacitated person.

(1) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, a guardian or conservator appointed under chapter 11.130 RCW has the right to access an incapacitated person's digital assets other than the content of electronic communications.

(2) Unless otherwise ordered by the court or directed by the user, a custodian shall disclose to a guardian the catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by an incapacitated person and any digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, if the guardian gives the custodian:

(a) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

(b) Certified copies of letters of guardianship and the court order appointing the guardian; and

(c) If requested by the custodian:

(i) A number, user name, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the account of the person; or

(ii) Evidence linking the account to the incapacitated person.

(3) A guardian may request a custodian of the incapacitated person's digital assets to suspend or terminate an account of the incapacitated person for good cause. A request made under this section must be accompanied by certified copies of letters of guardianship and the court order appointing the guardian.

[ 2020 c 312 s 721; 2016 c 140 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.